District of Columbia statutes.
29-803.02

Statement of authority.

(a)

A limited liability company may deliver to the Mayor for filing a statement of authority. The statement:

(1)

Shall include the name of the company and the street and mailing addresses of its principal office;

(2)

With respect to any position that exists in or with respect to the company, may state the authority, or limitations on the authority, of all persons holding the position to:

(A)

Execute an instrument transferring real property held in the name of the company; or

(B)

Enter into other transactions on behalf of, or otherwise act for or bind, the company; and

(3)

May state the authority, or limitations on the authority, of a specific person to:

(A)

Execute an instrument transferring real property held in the name of the company; or

(B)

Enter into other transactions on behalf of, or otherwise act for or bind, the company.

(b)

To amend or cancel a statement of authority filed by the Mayor under § 29-802.05(a), a limited liability company shall deliver to the Mayor for filing an amendment or cancellation stating:

(1)

The name of the company;

(2)

The street and mailing addresses of the company’s principal office;

(3)

The caption of the statement being amended or canceled and the date the statement being affected became effective; and

(4)

The contents of the amendment or a declaration that the statement being affected is canceled.

(c)

A statement of authority shall affect only the power of a person to bind a limited liability company to persons that are not members.

(d)

Subject to subsection (c) of this section and § 29-801.03(d) and except as otherwise provided in subsections (f), (g), and (h) of this section, a limitation on the authority of a person or a position contained in an effective statement of authority shall not by itself [be] evidence of knowledge or notice of the limitation by any person.

(e)

Subject to subsection (c), a grant of authority not pertaining to transfers of real property and contained in an effective statement of authority shall be conclusive in favor of a person that gives value in reliance on the grant, except to the extent that when the person gives value:

(1)

The person has knowledge to the contrary;

(2)

The statement has been canceled or restrictively amended under subsection (b) of this section; or

(3)

A limitation on the grant is contained in another statement of authority that became effective after the statement containing the grant became effective.

(f)

Subject to subsection (c) of this section, an effective statement of authority that grants authority to transfer real property held in the name of the limited liability company and that is recorded by certified copy in the office for recording transfers of the real property shall be conclusive in favor of a person that gives value in reliance on the grant without knowledge to the contrary, except to the extent that when the person gives value:

(1)

The statement has been canceled or restrictively amended under subsection (b) of this section and a certified copy of the cancellation or restrictive amendment has been recorded in the office for recording transfers of the real property; or

(2)

A limitation on the grant is contained in another statement of authority that became effective after the statement containing the grant became effective and a certified copy of the later-effective statement is recorded in the office for recording transfers of the real property.

(g)

Subject to subsection (c) of this section, if a certified copy of an effective statement containing a limitation on the authority to transfer real property held in the name of a limited liability company is recorded in the office for recording transfers of that real property, all persons shall be deemed to know of the limitation.

(h)

Subject to subsection (i) of this section, an effective statement of dissolution or termination shall be a cancellation of any filed statement of authority for the purposes of subsection (f) of this section and shall be a limitation on authority for the purposes of subsection (g) of this section.

(i)

After a statement of dissolution becomes effective, a limited liability company may deliver to the Mayor for filing and, if appropriate, may record a statement of authority that is designated as a post-dissolution statement of authority. The statement shall operate as provided in subsections (f) and (g) of this section.

(j)

Unless earlier canceled, an effective statement of authority shall be canceled by operation of law 5 years after the date on which the statement, or its most recent amendment, becomes effective. This cancellation shall operate without need for any recording under subsection (f) or (g) of this section.

(k)

An effective statement of denial shall operate as a restrictive amendment under this section and may be recorded by certified copy for the purposes of subsection (f)(1) of this section.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 302 of the Uniform Limited Company Act (2006 Act).
This section is referenced in § 29-801.03.